Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1268.04
Depository; bond alternatives; requirements.

In lieu of the bond required by section 72-1268.01, any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution making application to become a depository under the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act may give security as provided in the Public Funds Deposit Security Act to the state investment officer.

Laws 1985, LB 614, § 9;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 30;

Laws 1989, LB 377, § 11;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 25;

Laws 2003, LB 175, § 12.

Public Funds Deposit Security Act, see section 77-2386.